Minnesota, session 2025-2026, SF628.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MINNESOTA: Section 1. new text begin [62Q.491] CALCULATION OF ENROLLEE CONTRIBUTION TOWARD AN OUT-OF-POCKET MAXIMUM OR COST-SHARING REQUIREMENT. new text end new text begin (a) To the extent permitted by federal law, a health plan company must include any amounts paid by the enrollee or paid on behalf of the enrollee by another person when calculating an enrollee's overall contribution toward any out-of-pocket maximum or cost-sharing requirement under a health plan. new text end new text begin (b) For purposes of this section, "cost sharing" means any co-payment, coinsurance, or deductible. new text end new text begin EFFECTIVE DATE. new text end new text begin This section applies to health plans offered, issued, or renewed on or after January 1, 2026. new text end